Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3604
Act; how construed.

The COVID-19 Liability Act shall not be construed to:

(1) Create, recognize, or ratify a claim or cause of action of any kind;

(2) Eliminate or satisfy a required element of a claim or cause of action of any kind;

(3) Affect rights or coverage limits under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act;

(4) Abrogate, amend, repeal, alter, or affect any statutory or common law immunity or limitation of liability; or

(5) Constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the State of Nebraska or any political subdivision of the state.

Laws 2021, LB139, § 4.

Health Care Crisis Protocol Act, see section 71-2701.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.